District of Columbia statutes.
7-1231.14a

Prohibition on sexual orientation change efforts for minors.

(a)

A provider shall not engage in sexual orientation change efforts with a consumer who is a minor.

(b)

A violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be considered a failure to conform to acceptable conduct within the mental health profession under § 3-1205.14(a)(26) and shall subject a provider to discipline and penalties under § 3-1205.14(c).

History

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 214
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-218, § 2(b), 62 DCR 7